Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.185

Injunctive relief for violations of RCW 18.130.170 or 18.130.180.

If a person or business regulated by this chapter violates RCW 18.130.170 or 18.130.180, the attorney general, any prosecuting attorney, the secretary, the board, or any other person may maintain an action in the name of the state of Washington to enjoin the person from committing the violations. The injunction shall not relieve the offender from criminal prosecution, but the remedy by injunction shall be in addition to the liability of the offender to criminal prosecution and disciplinary action.

[ 1993 c 367 s 8; 1987 c 150 s 8; 1986 c 259 s 15.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 150: See RCW 18.122.901.

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.